Washington statutes.
RCW 15.85.050

Program to assist marketing and promotion of aquaculture products.

The department shall exercise its authorities, including those provided by chapters 15.64, 15.65, 15.66, and 43.23 RCW, to develop a program for assisting the state's aquaculture industry to market and promote the use of its products.

[ 1989 c 11 s 2; 1985 c 457 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 11: See note following RCW 9A.56.220.